Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1394
Historically significant real property; protests; procedure; appeal.

(1) Any decision of the State Historic Preservation Officer under sections 77-1385 to 77-1394 may be protested to the State Historic Preservation Officer within thirty days after the mailing of the written notice. If a protest is not filed, the action of the State Historic Preservation Officer shall be final. If a protest is filed, the State Historic Preservation Officer shall hear the protest within fourteen days after receipt of the protest.

(2) The State Historic Preservation Officer, within seven days after his or her final decision, shall mail written notice of his or her final decision to the owner and the county assessor of the county in which the real property is located.

(3) Any owner aggrieved by a final decision of the State Historic Preservation Officer may appeal the final decision to the district court within thirty days after mailing of the final decision by the State Historic Preservation Officer. The county assessor may appeal a final decision of the State Historic Preservation Officer to the district court within thirty days after mailing of the final decision by the State Historic Preservation Officer. The thirty-day period for filing such an appeal commences to run from the date of the mailing of the final decision. Upon receiving a copy of the final order on an appeal filed with the district court, the State Historic Preservation Officer shall mail a copy of the final order to the county assessor of the county in which the real property is located.

Laws 2005, LB 66, § 10.